Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0114

Subjects covered outside chapter.

The following subjects are covered in whole or in part outside this chapter:

(1) Delivery of record: RCW 23.95.110;

(2) Filing with secretary of state: RCW 23.95.200 through 23.95.265;

(3) Name of entity: RCW 23.95.300 through 23.95.315;

(4) Registered agent of entity: RCW 23.95.400 through 23.95.460;

(5) Foreign entities: RCW 23.95.500 through 23.95.555;

(6) Administrative dissolution: RCW 23.95.600 through 23.95.625;

(7) Miscellaneous provisions, including supplemental principles of law and reservation of power to amend or repeal: RCW 23.95.700 through 23.95.715.

[ 2019 c 37 s 114.]